Utah statutes.
41-1a-1009.   Abandoned and inoperable vehicles, vessels, and outboard motors -- Determination by commission -- Disposal of vehicles.

(1)  A vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor is abandoned and inoperable when:

(a)  the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor has been inspected by an authorized investigator or agent appointed by the commission; and

(b)  the authorized investigator or agent has made a written determination that the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor cannot be rebuilt or reconstructed in a manner that allows its use as designed by the manufacturer.

(2) (a)  Before issuing a written determination under Subsection (1), a signed statement is required from the purchaser of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor for salvage, identifying the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor by identification number and certifying that the inoperable vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor will not be rebuilt, reconstructed, or in any manner allowed to operate as designed by the manufacturer.

(b)  The operator of the junk or salvage yard disposing of an inoperable vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor is required to keep copies of the signed statements and other written records required by the commission.

(3)  Upon a determination that a vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor is inoperable and cannot be rebuilt or reconstructed, the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor may be converted to scrap or otherwise disposed of without necessity of compliance with the requirements of Sections 41-1a-1010 and 41-1a-1011.

